Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1870.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 1901 of Title 75 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a subsection to read:§ 1901. Exemption of persons, entities and vehicles from fees.* * *(c.1) Processing fee in lieu of driver's license fee or identification card fee.--(1) Except as provided under paragraph (3), no fee shall be charged for the issuance or renewal of a driver's license or identification card for an individual who is retired and receiving Social Security or other pension and whose total annual income does not exceed $29,906, subject to paragraph (2).1234567891011121314151617 (2) Beginning on the first day of January following the year in which this paragraph takes effect and on each January 1 thereafter, the maximum income amount under paragraph (1) shall be adjusted annually by the department to reflect the percentage change in the Consumer Price Index for All Urban Consumers (CPI-U) for the United States, as published by the United States Department of Labor, Bureau of Labor Statistics, for the previous 12-month period. The adjusted amount shall be rounded to the nearest whole dollar. The department shall transmit notice of the new maximum amount to the Legislative Reference Bureau for publication in the next available issue of the Pennsylvania Bulletin.(3) The department shall charge a processing fee of $12 to cover the cost for each issuance or renewal of a driver's license or identification card under paragraph (1).* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1870PN2325 - 2 - 1234567891011121314151617